Utah statutes.
59-6-103.   Returns and payments required of producers.
(1) (a)  Subject to Subsection (1)(b), a producer required to deduct and
withhold an amount under this chapter shall file a withholding return with the
commission:
(i)  for the amounts required to be deducted and withheld under this chapter
during the preceding calendar quarter; and
(ii)  on a form prescribed by the commission.
(b)  A withholding return described in Subsection (1)(a) is due on or before
the last day of April, July, October, and January.
(c)  A withholding return described in Subsection (1)(a) shall contain:
(i)  the name and address of each person receiving a payment subject to the
deduction and withholding requirements of this chapter for the calendar
quarter for which the withholding return is filed;
(ii)  for each person described in Subsection (1)(c)(i), the amount of payment
the person would have received from the production of minerals:
(A)  by the producer had the deduction and withholding required by this
chapter not been made; and
(B)  for the calendar quarter for which the withholding return is filed;
(iii)  for each person described in Subsection (1)(c)(i), the amount of
deduction and withholding under this chapter for the calendar quarter for
which the withholding return is filed;
(iv)  the name or description of the property from which the production of
minerals occurs that results in a payment subject to deduction and withholding
under this chapter; and
(v)  for each person described in Subsection (1)(c)(i), the interest of the
person in the production of minerals that results in a payment subject to
deduction and withholding under this chapter.
(2) (a)  If a producer receives an exemption certificate filed in accordance
with Section 59-6-102.1 from a business entity, the producer shall file a
withholding return with the commission:
(i)  on a form prescribed by the commission; and
(ii)  on or before the January 31 following the last day of the taxable year
for which the producer receives the exemption certificate from the business
entity.
(b)  The withholding return required by Subsection (2)(a) shall contain:
(i)  the name and address of the business entity that files the exemption
certificate in accordance with Section 59-6-102.1;
(ii)  the amount of the payment made by the producer to the business entity
that would have been subject to deduction and withholding under this chapter
had the business entity not filed the exemption certificate in accordance with
Section 59-6-102.1;
(iii)  the name or description of the property from which the production of
minerals occurs that would have resulted in a payment subject to deduction and
withholding under this chapter had the business entity not filed the exemption
certificate in accordance with Section 59-6-102.1; and
(iv)  the interest of the business entity in the production of minerals that
would have resulted in a payment subject to deduction and withholding under
this chapter had the business entity not filed the exemption certificate in
accordance with Section 59-6-102.1.
